Hawaii statutes.
§147-8 Appeal for classification; fee.
Whenever any quantity of any agricultural commodity has been inspected under
section 147-7 and a question arises as to whether the certificate issued with
respect to the inspection shows true grade, class, quality, condition, or
origin of the product, any person having a financial interest in the inspected
commodity, subject to any rules adopted by the department, may appeal to the
department for a reinspection and the department may reinspect and conduct
appropriate tests to determine and issue a written certificate of the true
grade, class, quality, condition, or origin of the product.

Whenever any appeal is made to the department
under this section it shall charge and collect or cause to be collected a
reasonable fee. The amount of the fee shall be fixed by rule and shall be
refunded if the appeal is sustained. [L 1945, c 252, §8; RL 1955, §22-7; am L
Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; HRS §147-8; am L 1997, c 345, §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next